District of Columbia statutes.
35-203

Prosecutions to be on information.

Prosecutions for violations of any of the provisions of §§ 35-202, 35-206, and 35-207 shall be on information of the Corporation Counsel filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by or on behalf of the District of Columbia.

May 23, 1908, 35 Stat. 250, ch. 190, § 17
Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 995, ch. 150, § 8
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 88-503, § 21
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-187, § 2(b), 47 DCR 7073

History

1981 Ed., § 44-203.
1973 Ed., § 44-203.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-187 substituted for “Public Service Commission” the phrase “Corporation Counsel” and for the phrase “the Commission” the phrase “the District of Columbia”.

Effect of Amendments